Utah statutes.
77-32a-8.   Default in payment as contempt -- What constitutes contempt --
Imprisonment.
Unless the defendant shows that his default was not attributable to an
intentional refusal to obey the order of the court or to a failure on his part
to make a good faith effort to make the payment, the court may find that his
default constitutes contempt and may order him committed until the costs or a
specified part thereof, are paid.
